de: Verwendungszweck: Schwerlast; OEM/Direkter Ersatz; Offroad; Performance; Racing; Abschleppen; Sonstige
tr: Kullanım amacı: Ağır hizmet; OEM/doğrudan değişim; Off-road; Performans; Yarış; Çekme; Diğer
ja: 使用目的: 高耐久; OEM/直接交換; オフロード; パフォーマンス; レーシング; 牽引; その他
zh-CN: 适用场景: 重型; OEM/直接替换; 越野; 高性能; 竞速; 拖曳; 其他
fi: Käyttötarkoitus: Raskas käyttö; Alkuperäisosa/suora varaosa; Off-road; Suorituskyky; Kilpakäyttö; Hinaus; Muu
pl: Przeznaczenie: Do dużych obciążeń; Część OEM / bezpośredni zamiennik; Off-road; Sportowe (Performance); Wyścigowe; Holowanie; Inne
lt-LT: Numatyta paskirtis: Sunkiems darbams; OEM / tiesioginis pakaitalas; Becelei; Geresniam našumui; Lenktynėms; Tempimui; Kita
el: Προβλεπόμενη χρήση: Βαρέως τύπου; OEM/άμεση αντικατάσταση; Εκτός δρόμου; Απόδοσης; Αγωνιστικό; Ρυμούλκηση; Άλλο
th: วัตถุประสงค์การใช้งาน: สำหรับงานหนัก; OEM/อะไหล่ทดแทนโดยตรง; ออฟโรด; ประสิทธิภาพ; สำหรับแข่ง; การลากจูง; อื่นๆ
ru: Предназначенное использование: Для тяжелых условий эксплуатации; OEM / прямая замена; Внедорожное использование; Тюнинг (performance); Гоночные; Буксировка; Другое
vi: Mục đích sử dụng dự định: Chuyên chở nặng; OEM/thay thế trực tiếp; Địa hình; Hiệu suất; Đua xe; Kéo rơ-moóc; Khác
ko: 용도: 고강도; OEM/직접 교체; 오프로드; 고성능; 레이싱; 견인; 기타
sl-SI: Predviden namen uporabe: Za težke obremenitve; OEM/neposredna zamenjava; Terensko; Zmogljivost; Dirkanje; Vleka; Drugo
cs: Zamýšlené použití: Pro vysoké zatížení; OEM / přímá náhrada; Off-road; Výkonnostní; Závodní; Tažení; Jiné
nb: Tiltenkt bruk: Kraftig bruk; OEM / direkte erstatning; Offroad; Ytelse; Racing; Tauing; Annet
pt-BR: Uso pretendido: Uso pesado; OEM/substituição direta; Off-road; Alto desempenho; Corridas; Reboque; Outro
hr-HR: Namijenjena uporaba: Za teške uvjete rada; OEM / izravna zamjena; Off-road; Visoke performanse; Utrkivanje; Vuča; Ostalo
it: Uso previsto: Per uso intensivo; Sostituzione diretta/OEM; Fuoristrada; Performance; Racing; Da traino; Altro
sv: Avsedd användning: För tung belastning; OEM/direkt ersättning; Terräng; Prestanda; Tävling; Bogsering; Annat
da: Tiltænkt anvendelse: Intensiv brug; OEM/direkte udskiftning; Offroad; Ydeevne; Race; Bugsering; Andet
fr: Usage prévu: Usage intensif; OEM/pièce de rechange directe; Tout-terrain; Performance; Course; Remorquage; Autre
bg-BG: Предназначение: За голямо натоварване; OEM/директна замяна; Офроуд; Ефективност; Състезателно; Теглене; Други
es: Uso previsto: Uso intensivo; OEM/Reemplazo directo; Todoterreno; Alto rendimiento; Carreras; Remolque; Otro
sk-SK: Určené použitie: Pre vysoké zaťaženie; OEM/priama náhrada; Off-road; Výkonnosť; Pretekárske; Ťahanie; Iné
zh-TW: 適用用途: 重型; OEM/直接替換; 越野; 性能; 競速; 拖曳; 其他
pt-PT: Uso pretendido: Serviço pesado; OEM/substituição direta; Todo-o-terreno; Desempenho; Competição; Reboque; Outro
en: Intended use: Heavy-duty; OEM/direct replacement; Off-road; Performance; Racing; Towing; Other
hu: Rendeltetésszerű használat: Nagy teherbírású; Gyári (OEM) / közvetlen cserealkatrész; Terep (Off-road); Nagy teljesítményű; Verseny; Vontatás; Egyéb
nl: Beoogd gebruik: Heavy-duty; OEM/directe vervanging; Off-road; Prestaties; Racen; Slepen; Overig
ro-RO: Utilizare preconizată: Condiții grele; Înlocuire OEM/directă; Off-road; Performanță; Curse; Tractare; Altele